Hawaii statutes.
[§342F-30.8] Leaf blowers;
restrictions. (a) In any urban land use district, as designated pursuant
to section 205-2, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate a leaf blower
within a residential zone or within one hundred feet of a residential zone in
the State, except between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 6:00 p.m. on any day
except Sunday or a state or federal holiday, and between the hours of 9:00 a.m.
and 6:00 p.m. on Sunday or any state or federal holiday.

(b) Violators shall be fined $50 for the first
violation, $100 for the second violation, $200 for the third violation, and
$500 for each subsequent violation.

(c) Government entities, and agents acting on behalf
of government entities, shall not be subject to this section.

(d) Any county may adopt a rule or ordinance that
places stricter limitations on the use of leaf blowers than are in this
section. In case of a conflict between the requirements or limitations of this
section and any county rule or ordinance regarding the use of leaf blowers, the
more restrictive requirements shall apply.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

"Leaf blower" means any machine used
to blow leaves, dirt, or other debris off sidewalks, driveways, lawns, and
other surfaces.

"State holiday" means any day established
as a state holiday in section 8-1. [L 2010, c 206, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next